Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
188

FISHING
RIGHTS AND REGULATIONS

Part I. Fishing Rights--Repealed

Section

188-1 to 14 Repealed

Part II. Fishing Regulations, Generally

188-21, 22 Repealed

188-22.5 State marine waters

188-22.6 Designation of community-based subsistence
fishing

area

188-22.7 Miloli‘i fisheries management area

188-22.8 Limu management area

188-22.9 Ha‘ena community-based subsistence fishing
area;

restrictions; regulations

188-23 Possession or use of explosives, electrofishing

devices, and poisonous substances in state
waters

prohibited; exception

188-24 to 30.5 Repealed

188-31 Permits to take aquatic life for aquarium
purposes

188-31.5 Aquarium fish for export; monthly count

188-32, 33 Repealed

188-34 Fishing in Honolulu harbor, Hilo harbor,
restricted

188-35 Fishing in certain waters

188-36 Hawaii marine laboratory refuge

188-37 Fishing in the Northwestern Hawaiian
Islands

188-38, 39 Repealed

188-39.5 Manta rays; prohibitions, penalties and
fines

188-40, 40.5 Repealed

188-40.6 Shark feeding; prohibitions; exceptions;
penalties

188-40.7 Shark fins; prohibited

188-41, 42 Repealed

188-42.5 Hihiwai, hapawai, and opae kala‘ole
selling prohibited

188-43 Hinana and oopu, taking of, prohibited

188-44 Licenses for mullet

188-45 Licenses for nehu, iao, and other baitfish

188-46 to 49 Repealed

188-50 License; application; fees; restrictions

188-51 to 52.5 Repealed

188-53 Fishing reserves, refuges, and public
fishing areas

188-54 to 56 Repealed

188-57 Licenses for certain crustaceans

188-58 Repealed

188-58.5 Female ula (spiny lobsters), Kona crabs,
and Samoan

crabs; taking or killing prohibited

188-59 to 67 Repealed

188-68 Permits for coral and rock with marine
life attached

188-70 Penalties

188-71 Harassment of fishermen; prohibition

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Taking a monk seal prohibited, see §195D-4.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next